Oklahoma, session 2026, SB1452.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE PEOPLE OF THE STATE OF OKLAHOMA:


SECTION 1. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 109, as


amended by Section 1, Chapter 24, O.S.L. 2024 (43 O.S. Supp. 2025,


Section 109), is amended to read as follows:


Section 109. A. In awarding the custody of a minor unmarried


child or in appointing a general guardian for the child, the court


shall consider what appears to be in the best interests of the


physical and mental and moral welfare of the child. Subject to


subsection I of this section, there shall be a presumption,


rebuttable by a preponderance of the evidence, that joint custody


and equally shared parenting time is in the best interest of the


child.



Req. No. 2305 Page 1


B. The court, pursuant to the provisions of subsection A of


this section, may grant the care, custody, and control of a child to


either parent or to the parents jointly.


For the purposes of this section, the terms joint custody and


joint care, custody, and control mean the sharing by parents in all


or some of the aspects of physical and legal care, custody, and


control of their children.


C. If either or both parents have requested joint custody, the


parents shall file with the court their plans for the exercise of


joint care, custody, and control of their child. The parents of the


child may submit a plan jointly, or either parent or both parents


may submit separate plans. Any plan shall include, but is not


limited to, provisions detailing the physical living arrangements


for the child, child support obligations, medical and dental care


for the child, school placement, and visitation rights. A plan


shall be accompanied by an affidavit signed by each parent stating


that the parent agrees to the plan and will abide by its terms. The


plan and affidavit shall be filed with the petition for a divorce or


legal separation or after the petition is filed.


D. The court shall issue a final plan for the exercise of joint


care, custody, and control of the child or children, based upon the


plan submitted by the parents, separate or jointly, with appropriate


changes deemed by the court to be in the best interests of the



Req. No. 2305 Page 2


child. The court also may reject a request for joint custody and


proceed as if the request for joint custody had not been made.


E. The parents having joint custody of the child may modify the


terms of the plan for joint care, custody, and control. The


modification to the plan shall be filed with the court and included


with the plan. If the court determines the modifications are in the


best interests of the child, the court shall approve the


modifications.


F. The court also may modify the terms of the plan for joint


care, custody, and control upon the request of one parent. The


court shall not modify the plan unless the modifications are in the


best interests of the child.


G. 1. The court may terminate a joint custody decree upon the


request of one or both of the parents or whenever the court


determines the decree is not in the best interests of the child.


2. Upon termination of a joint custody decree, the court shall


proceed and issue a modified decree for the care, custody, and


control of the child as if no such joint custody decree had been


made.


H. In the event of a dispute between the parents having joint


custody of a child as to the interpretation of a provision of the


plan, the court may appoint an arbitrator to resolve the dispute.


The arbitrator shall be a disinterested person knowledgeable in


domestic relations law and family counseling. The determination of

Req. No. 2305 Page 3


the arbitrator shall be final and binding on the parties to the


proceedings until further order of the court. If a parent refuses


to consent to arbitration, the court may terminate the joint custody


decree.


I. 1. In every proceeding in which there is a dispute as to


the custody of a minor child, a determination by the court that


child abuse, domestic violence, stalking, or harassment has occurred


raises a rebuttable presumption that sole custody, joint legal or


physical custody, or any shared parenting plan with the perpetrator


of child abuse, domestic violence, harassing, or stalking behavior


is detrimental and not in the best interest of the child, and it is


in the best interest of the child to reside with the parent who is


not a perpetrator of child abuse, domestic violence, harassing, or


stalking behavior.


2. For the purposes of this subsection:


a. “child abuse” shall have the same meaning as “abuse”


as defined pursuant to the Oklahoma Children’s Code in


Section 1-1-105 of Title 10A of the Oklahoma Statutes,


b. “domestic violence” means the threat of the infliction


of physical injury, any act of physical harm or the


creation of a reasonable fear thereof, or the


intentional infliction of emotional distress by a


parent or a present or former member of the household


of the child, against the child or another member of

Req. No. 2305 Page 4


the household including coercive control by a parent


involving physical, sexual, psychological, emotional,


economic, or financial abuse,


c. “harassment” means a knowing and willful course or


pattern of conduct by a parent directed at another


parent which seriously alarms or is a nuisance to the


person, and which serves no legitimate purpose


including, but not limited to, harassing or obscene


telephone calls or conduct that would cause a


reasonable person to have a fear of death or bodily


injury, and


d. “stalking” means the willful course of conduct by a


parent who repeatedly follows or harasses another


person as defined in Section 1173 of Title 21 of the


Oklahoma Statutes.


3. If a parent is absent or relocates as a result of an act of


domestic violence by the other parent, the absence or relocation


shall not be a factor that weighs against the parent in determining


custody or visitation.


4. The court shall consider, as a primary factor, the safety


and well-being of the child who is the victim of child abuse and of


the parent who is the victim of domestic violence, harassment, or


stalking behavior, in addition to other facts regarding the best


interest of the child.

Req. No. 2305 Page 5


5. The court shall consider the history of the parent causing


physical harm, bodily injury, assault, verbal threats, stalking, or


harassing behavior, or the fear of physical harm, bodily injury, or


assault to another person including the minor child, in determining


issues regarding custody and visitation.


SECTION 2. AMENDATORY 43 O.S. 2021, Section 112, is


amended to read as follows:


Section 112. A. A petition or cross-petition for a divorce,


legal separation, or annulment must state whether or not the parties


have minor children of the marriage. If there are minor children of


the marriage, the court:


1. Shall make provision for guardianship, custody, medical


care, support, and education of the children;


2. Unless not in the best interests of the children, may


provide for the visitation of the noncustodial parent with any of


the children of the noncustodial parent; and


3. May modify or change any order whenever circumstances render


the change proper either before or after final judgment in the


action; provided, that the amount of the periodic child support


payment shall not be modified retroactively or payment of all or a


portion of the past due amount waived, except by mutual agreement of


the obligor and obligee, or if the obligee has assigned child


support rights to the Department of Human Services or other entity,


by agreement of the Department or other entity. Unless the parties

Req. No. 2305 Page 6


agree to the contrary, a completed child support computation form


provided for in Section 120 of this title shall be required to be


filed with the child support order.


The social security numbers of both parents and the child shall


be included on the child support order summary form provided for in


Section 120 of this title, which shall be submitted to the Central


Case Registry central case registry as provided for in Section 112A


of this title with all child support or paternity orders.


B. In any action in which there are minor unmarried children in


awarding or modifying the custody of the child or in appointing a


general guardian for the child, the court shall be guided by the


provisions of Section 112.5 of this title and shall consider what


appears to be in the best interests of the child.


C. 1. When it is in the best interests of a minor unmarried


child, the court shall:


a. assure children of frequent and continuing contact


with both parents after the parents have separated or


dissolved their marriage, and


b. encourage parents to share the rights and


responsibilities of child rearing in order to effect


this policy.


2. There shall be neither a legal preference nor a presumption


for or against, rebuttable by a preponderance of the evidence, that



Req. No. 2305 Page 7


joint legal custody, joint physical custody, or sole custody and


equally shared parenting time is in the best interest of the child.


3. When in the best interests of the child, custody shall be


awarded in a way which assures the frequent and continuing contact


of the child with both parents. When awarding custody to either


parent, the court:


a. shall consider, among other facts, which parent is


more likely to allow the child or children frequent


and continuing contact with the noncustodial parent,


and


b. shall not prefer a parent as a custodian of the child


because of the gender of that parent.


4. In any action, there shall be neither a legal preference or


a presumption for or against private or public school or home-


schooling in awarding the custody of a child, or in appointing a


general guardian for the child.


5. Notwithstanding any custody determination made pursuant to


the Oklahoma Children’s Code, when a parent of a child is required


to be separated from a child due to military service, the court


shall not enter a final order modifying an existing custody order


until such time as the parent has completed the term of duty


requiring separation. For purposes of this paragraph:


a. in the case of a parent who is a member of the Army,


Navy, Air Force, Marine Corps, or Coast Guard, the

Req. No. 2305 Page 8


term “military service” means a combat deployment,


contingency operation, or natural disaster requiring


the use of orders that do not permit any family member


to accompany the member,


b. in the case of a parent who is a member of the


National Guard, the term “military service” military


service means service under a call to active service


authorized by the President of the United States or


the Secretary of Defense for a period of more than


thirty (30) consecutive days under 32 U.S.C., Section


502(f) for purposes of responding to a national


emergency declared by the President and supported by


federal funds. “Military service” Military service


shall include any period during which a member is


absent from duty on account of sickness, wounds,


leave, or other lawful cause, and


c. the court may enter a temporary custody or visitation


order pursuant to the requirements of the Deployed


Parents Custody and Visitation Act.


6. In making an order for custody, the court shall require


compliance with Section 112.3 of this title.


D. 1. Except for good cause shown, a pattern of failure to


allow court-ordered visitation may be determined to be contrary to



Req. No. 2305 Page 9


the best interests of the child and as such may be grounds for


modification of the child custody order.


2. For any action brought pursuant to the provisions of this


section which the court determines to be contrary to the best


interests of the child, the prevailing party shall be entitled to


recover court costs, attorney fees, and any other reasonable costs


and expenses incurred with the action.


E. Except as otherwise provided by Section 112.1A of this


title, any child shall be entitled to support by the parents until


the child reaches eighteen (18) years of age. If a child is


regularly enrolled in and attending high school, as set forth in


Section 11-103.6 of Title 70 of the Oklahoma Statutes, other means


of high school education, or an alternative high school education


program as a full-time student, the child shall be entitled to


support by the parents until the child graduates from high school or


until the age of twenty (20) years, whichever occurs first. Full-


time attendance shall include regularly scheduled breaks from the


school year. No hearing or further order is required to extend


support pursuant to this subsection after the child reaches the age


of eighteen (18) years.


F. In any case in which provision is made for the custody or


support of a minor child or enforcement of such order and before


hearing the matter or signing any orders, the court shall inquire


whether public assistance money or medical support has been provided

Req. No. 2305 Page 10


by the Department of Human Services, hereafter referred to as the


Department, for the benefit of each child. If public assistance


money, medical support, or child support services under the state


child support plan as provided in Section 237 of Title 56 of the


Oklahoma Statutes have been provided for the benefit of the child,


the Department shall be a necessary party for the adjudication of


the debt due to the State of Oklahoma, as defined in Section 238 of


Title 56 of the Oklahoma Statutes, and for the adjudication of


paternity, child support, and medical insurance coverage for the


minor children in accordance with federal regulations. When an


action is filed, the petitioner shall give the Department notice of


the action according to Section 2004 of Title 12 of the Oklahoma


Statutes. The Department shall not be required to intervene in the


action to have standing to appear and participate in the action.


When the Department is a necessary party to the action, any orders


concerning paternity, child support, medical support, or the debt


due to the State of Oklahoma shall be approved and signed by the


Department.


G. In any case in which a child support order or custody order


or both is entered, enforced, or modified, the court may make a


determination of the arrearages of child support.


SECTION 3. This act shall become effective November 1, 2026.




60-2-2305 BLB 1/8/2026 12:59:02 PM

Req. No. 2305 Page 11